Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3303
Order; issuance; requirements.

The order may issue upon a showing by affidavit of a peace officer that (1) there is probable cause to believe that an offense has been committed; (2) there is probable cause to believe that the person subject to the order has committed the offense; (3) procurement of evidence of identifying physical characteristics through nontestimonial identification procedures from an identified or particularly described individual may contribute to the identification of the individual who committed such offense; and (4) the identified or described individual has refused, or there is reason to believe he or she will refuse, to voluntarily provide the desired evidence of identifying physical characteristics. The contents of the affidavit may be supplemented or augmented by the affidavits of other persons or by sworn testimony given to the issuing judge or magistrate.

Laws 1971, LB 568, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 31.

The identifying physical characteristics statutes require a showing of probable cause to believe the person seized has engaged in an articulable criminal offense before the judicial officer can issue an order to produce identifying physical characteristics. State v. Marcus, 265 Neb. 910, 660 N.W.2d 837 (2003).

When determining whether an order to produce identifying physical characteristics was based on a showing of probable cause, a court considers the totality of the circumstances. State v. Marcus, 265 Neb. 910, 660 N.W.2d 837 (2003).

The provisions of this section require a showing that there is both probable cause to believe that a crime has been committed and probable cause to believe the person being compelled to submit to nontestimonial identification procedures committed that crime. State v. Evans, 215 Neb. 433, 338 N.W.2d 788 (1983).